Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-206
Lease; discharge by entry on margin of record; procedure.

Any oil and gas or mining lease that has been or may hereafter be recorded in the office of the register of deeds of any county may be discharged and canceled of record by an entry on the margin of the record thereof signed by the lessee or his assigns of record, or his duly authorized attorney in fact or personal representative, or, if a corporation, by its duly authorized officers, surrendering all of his or its right, title and interest in and to such lease in the presence of the register of deeds or his deputy, who shall subscribe the same as witness.

Laws 1925, c. 133, § 3, p. 351;

C.S.1929, § 57-203;

R.S.1943, § 57-206.